California statutes. Penal Code
Subject to regulations adopted by the board of supervisors the superintendent shall maintain discipline on an industrial farm. Whenever the superintendent reports to the county classification committee which assigned any prisoner to an industrial farm or camp that the prisoner refuses to abide by the rules of the farm or camp or refuses to work thereon, the committee may make an order transferring the prisoner to the county jail or city jail for the unexpired term of his sentence, and all sums credited to the prisoner shall be forfeited by him unless they have been ordered paid to some person dependent upon him. Thereafter the committee may reassign the person to the industrial farm or industrial road camp upon recommendation of the superintendent of the farm or camp.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4133.

The boundary of every industrial farm established under the provisions of this article shall be marked by a fence, hedge or by some other visible line. Every person confined on any industrial farm who escapes therefrom or attempts to escape therefrom shall upon conviction thereof be imprisoned in a state prison, or in the county jail or industrial farm for not to exceed one year. Any such imprisonment shall begin at the expiration of the imprisonment in effect at the time of the escape.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1117, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

4134.

Any board of supervisors which has established or desires to establish an industrial farm or industrial road camp may at any time appoint an advisory board to consist of not less than three nor more than five persons, one member of which shall be a penologist and one member a physician.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4135.

The advisory board shall acquaint itself with the conduct of the jails in the county, keep itself informed about the administration of the industrial farm or industrial road camp, and report its recommendations and suggestions to the board of supervisors. It may visit any jail within the county, examine the records thereof, and ascertain whether or not there are any persons illegally committed to or detained at any jail.

The advisory board shall encourage recreational and educational activities on the industrial farm.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4136.

Sections 4011, 4011.5, 4011.6 and 4011.7 are applicable to county industrial farms, county industrial road camps, and joint county road camps established pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 517.)
-------------------------------------------

4137.

The board of supervisors of any county in which a county industrial farm, industrial road camp, or honor camp has been established may, by ordinance, authorize the sheriff or any such person responsible to the board for the care, treatment, and custody of prisoners assigned to him as sentenced misdemeanants or felons, serving time as a condition of probation, to remove such prisoners from the facility to which they have been assigned under custody, without court order, for purposes such as: private medical, vision, or dental care, psychological care, vocational services, educational services, and funerals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 133.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Joint County Road Camp Act [4200. - 4227.]

4200.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Joint County Road Camp Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4201.

Any two or more counties may form a district for the purpose of requiring all persons confined in the county jails of such counties, under a final judgment of imprisonment rendered in a criminal action or proceeding, to perform labor on the public works or public highways in all or any of such counties, and to maintain for that purpose one or more joint county road camps in which such jail prisoners of any or all of said counties may work together.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4202.

Any district organized under this article shall have and exercise the powers expressly granted in this article, together with such other powers as are reasonably implied therefrom and necessary and proper to carry out the objects and purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4203.

The board of supervisors of any county may initiate proceedings proposing the creation of a joint district for the purpose of maintaining a joint county road camp or camps under the provisions of this article to be composed of two or more counties having a combined population of not less than 50,000 persons, according to the official census next preceding the formation of such district, by the adoption of a resolution reciting the following:

(1) That it will be beneficial to the public interest to create a joint district wherein persons confined in any county jail within such district under a final judgment of imprisonment rendered in a criminal action or proceeding may be required to perform labor on the public works or ways within said district, and that a joint county road camp or camps be established and maintained for that purpose.

(2) The names of the counties proposed to be included in the proposed district which will be benefited by the formation thereof.

(3) That it is proposed to create a joint district for the establishment and maintenance of a joint county road camp under the provisions of this article composed of the counties so named.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4204.

When adopted certified copies of the resolution provided for in Section 4203, shall be transmitted to the several clerks of the boards of supervisors in each of the counties named in the resolution other than that in which the proceedings are initiated.

Upon the adoption of the resolution provided for in Section 4203, the board of supervisors of the county adopting the same shall name and appoint a member of the board to represent the county upon the board of directors of the joint district proposed to be organized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4205.

Upon receipt of the resolution adopted under Section 4203, the boards of supervisors of the counties affected and to whom the same may be directed shall consider the advisability of creating and organizing a joint district as proposed in said resolution and, upon determining the facts involved therein, shall severally adopt resolutions either rejecting or approving the proposal to create such joint district. Each resolution of approval shall, in addition to the matter otherwise required therein, also name and appoint the member of the board of supervisors of the county adopting the resolution qualified to represent such county upon the board of directors of the proposed joint district. A certified copy of the resolution of approval shall be forthwith transmitted to the clerk of the board of supervisors initiating the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4206.

The board of supervisors of any county initiating proceedings for the creation of a joint district under this article shall, after the receipt of a copy of the resolution approving the proposal to form such district as provided in Section 4205 from the board of supervisors of each county proposed to be included within any such joint district, adopt a resolution declaring the creation and organization of said joint district and setting forth the names of the counties composing said district. A certified copy of the resolution shall be transmitted to and filed with the Secretary of State, whereupon the joint district shall be deemed created and organized and shall exercise all the powers granted in this article and shall bear the name and designation of “Joint County Road Camp District No. ________ of the State of California.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4207.

All districts organized under this article shall be numbered in the order of their creation, the number to be assigned to said district forthwith upon the organization thereof by the Secretary of State, and the Secretary of State shall keep and maintain in his office a list and register showing the joint county road camp districts organized under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4208.

The Secretary of State shall furnish and transmit to the clerk of the board of supervisors of the county adopting the initial resolution for the organization of any district under this article a certificate of the organization of the same. Upon receipt of the certificate the clerk shall within 10 days send a certified copy of the certificate to each of the clerks of the several boards of supervisors of the counties constituting the district, and shall also within the time specified in this section notify each supervisor appointed as a member of the board of directors of the district of such fact and of the time and place of the first meeting of the board of directors of the district. The time and place of the meeting shall be fixed and determined by the clerk of the board adopting the initial resolution, but said time of meeting shall be within 30 days after the date of mailing notices thereof. The necessary expense incurred by supervisors in attending and in going to and coming from any meeting of the board of directors of the district shall constitute a county charge of their respective counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4209.

The body formed under Section 4208 shall be called the board of directors of such district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4210.

The delegates from each county may enter into an agreement with the other counties for and on behalf of the county appointing them, binding said counties to the joint enterprise provided for in this article and apportioning the cost of establishing and maintaining a road camp or camps, such cost to be apportioned on the basis of the population of the respective counties as determined by the official declaration of the State Legislature determining the population of counties next preceding such apportionment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4211.

All sums found due from any county according to the provisions of this article are a debt against said county, and may be collected in the manner provided by law by the said board of directors of a district formed under this article, or, in its behalf, by the board of supervisors of any county in the district by an action instituted and tried in any county in the district in which the same may be first filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4212.

The board of directors may establish the road camp or camps provided for in this article, and may furnish such camp or camps with the necessary personnel and equipment to transport, feed, clothe, shelter and lodge the prisoners who shall work therein and with the necessary hand tools and appliances for their work, and may employ one or more persons to supervise the camp and the work of the prisoners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4213.

Each county in a district formed under this article shall pay from its general fund its proportionate share to the board of directors of such amount as the board may designate to constitute a cash revolving fund to carry on the work and expense of maintaining such camp or camps. Each month a statement of the expense of the camp shall be sent to the board of supervisors of each county in the district, together with a claim for its proportionate share of expenses. Amounts when received shall be paid into the cash revolving fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4214.

Within 15 days after any person is confined in the county jail of any county within a district under a final judgment of imprisonment rendered in a criminal action or proceeding, the county parole commissioners of such county shall meet and determine whether he should be paroled to work in the joint county road camps established under this article. If it appears to the commissioners that a prisoner is a fit subject for parole to a camp formed under this article, they shall forthwith parole him with the requirement that he perform labor in such joint county road camp wherever it may then be situated, or may thereafter be moved to during his term of imprisonment, and he shall forthwith be transferred by the sheriff of the county in which he is confined to said road camp at the expense of the county in which he was sentenced to imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4215.

The boards of directors of joint county road camp districts may contract with the State Department of Public Works for the employment of jail prisoners in the construction, improvement, or maintenance of any portion of any state highway now existing, to be constructed, or under construction within said district and may also contract with any board of supervisors or with any supervisor of any road district, within said district, for the employment of jail prisoners on any county road or county public work within any county or road district lying within any district created under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4216.

When the prisoners of a road camp are engaged in the construction or maintenance of any portion of the state highway the expense of maintaining them together with the compensation of such prisoners fixed by the board of directors as provided in this article, and the expense of supervision and maintenance of the road camp and the prisoners thereof, shall be paid for by the district and the State Department of Public Works upon such terms and in such proportions as may be agreed upon by the Department of Public Works and the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4217.

Any money expended by the Department of Public Works under the provisions of this article shall be taken from any funds available for the construction or maintenance of the highway upon which the prisoners of the district labor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4218.

The State Department of Public Works may contract with the boards of directors of the joint districts created under this article for all the purposes stated in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4219.

When a joint road camp, and the prisoners thereof, are employed in the construction or maintenance of any county way, road or public work, the total expense of maintenance, operation and supervision, of said camp, and the compensation of the prisoners thereof shall be paid for from any funds which may be available for the construction or maintenance of such road, highway or other public works on which said prisoners are employed, or from the county general fund upon a four-fifths vote of the board of supervisors of said county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4220.

All payments provided for in Section 4219 shall be made by warrants drawn on the proper fund in favor of “Joint County Road Camp District No. ________” (inserting the number assigned by the Secretary of State), and shall become a portion of the revolving fund provided for in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4221.

Whenever the revolving fund provided for in this article after payment of all bills due against a district exceeds twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or exceeds such lesser sum as the board of directors shall determine to be a sufficient working fund for the purposes of this article, the board shall apportion such surplus to be repaid to the counties forming the district, in the same proportion in which they are required to contribute to the revolving fund in the first instance, the payments to go into the county general funds of such counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4222.

The board of directors may make such rules as it deems proper for the government of camps and the conduct of prisoners therein and may fix a reasonable compensation, not to exceed seventy-five cents ($0.75) per day, for each prisoner performing labor in a camp.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4223.

Each prisoner shall be charged with the cost of all tools and appliances for the performance of labor which are furnished to him, and upon his release or discharge from a camp, he shall deliver to the superintendent thereof all tools and appliances for which he is charged and shall thereupon be entitled to full credit for the cost of the tools and appliances so returned. The cost of any appliances and tools not returned as provided in this section shall be deducted from the compensation due the prisoner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4224.

All sums earned by any prisoner may be retained until he has completed his sentence, or until he is released or discharged, and shall thereupon be paid to him. If any prisoner has dependents, his compensation shall be paid to such dependents monthly as earned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4225.

The board of supervisors of any county not included within any joint county road camp district, and having a population of 150,000 or more persons, may establish and maintain a county road camp as provided in this article, and may provide a board of directors thereof, by passing the resolution and receiving the certificate of organization provided for in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4226.

The board of supervisors of any county covered by Section 4225 shall nominate three of its members to serve as directors of the district formed thereunder, and such directors shall have and exercise all the powers and perform all the duties granted to and imposed by this article upon boards of directors of joint county road camp districts, and such county shall constitute, and be recognized and dealt with in all respects as a joint county road camp district within the meaning of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4227.

A joint county road camp district formed under this article may be dissolved in the following manner:

1. The board or boards of supervisors of a county or counties containing more than fifty percent (50%) of the population of the entire district shall by a unanimous vote adopt a resolution stating that the existence of a county road camp is no longer desirable for the public welfare and announcing the intention to withdraw therefrom and to dissolve said district.

2. The resolution or resolutions so adopted shall be communicated to the clerks of the boards of supervisors of all the counties comprising the district and also to the Secretary of State.

3. If it appears that the resolution was unanimously adopted by the board or boards of supervisors in the counties desiring to withdraw, and that such county or counties contain more than fifty percent (50%) of the entire population in the district, the Secretary of State shall thereupon certify to the clerks of the boards of supervisors of the counties composing the district that the district is dissolved.

4. Thereupon the board of directors of the district shall within 90 days:

(a) Abolish the road camp or camps;

(b) Return all prisoners therein to their respective county jails;

(c) Dispose of all equipment belonging to said camp or camps and the district; 

(d) Render an accounting to the clerks of the boards of supervisors of the counties composing such district of all sums of money received and paid out since their last previous accounting, including the balance of revolving fund on hand at said last previous accounting;

(e) Apportion and repay to said counties all sums of money then remaining in their hands, and they shall thereupon be relieved of further responsibility in said matter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Advisory Committees for Adult Detention Facilities [4300. - 4305.]

4300.

The board of supervisors may establish in each county a county advisory committee on adult detention.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 349.)
-------------------------------------------

4301.

There shall be 6, 9, or 12 members of the committee. One-third shall be appointed by the board of supervisors, one-third by the sheriff, and one-third by the presiding judge of the superior court. Of the members appointed by the presiding judge, one shall be a member of the State Bar.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 569.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4302.

The members of the committee shall hold office for four years, and until their successors are appointed and qualify. Of those first appointed by the sheriff, superior court judge, and the board of supervisors, one shall hold office for two years, and one for four years; and the respective terms of the members first appointed shall be determined by lot as soon as possible after their appointment. When a vacancy occurs in the committee by expiration of the term of office of any member thereof, his successor shall be appointed to hold office for a term of four years. When a vacancy occurs for any other reason, the appointee shall hold office for the unexpired term of his predecessor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 349.)
-------------------------------------------

4303.

Members of the committee shall serve without compensation, but shall be allowed their reasonable expenses as approved by the presiding judge of the superior court. The expenses shall be a charge upon the county in which the court has jurisdiction, and shall be paid out of the county treasury upon a written order of the presiding judge of the superior court directing the county auditor to draw a warrant upon the county treasurer for the specified amount of such expenses. All orders by the presiding judge upon the county treasurer shall be filed in duplicate with the county board of supervisors and sheriff.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 570.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4304.

The committee shall file a report within 90 days after the thirty-first day of December of the calendar year for which such report is made, copies of which shall be filed with the county board of supervisors, the presiding judge, the sheriff, the Board of Corrections, and the Attorney General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 571.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4305.

The committee shall annually inspect the city and county adult detention facilities. Such inspection shall be concerned with the conditions of inmate employment, detention, care, custody, training, and treatment on the basis of, but not limited to, the minimum standards established by the Board of Corrections. A report of such visitations together with pertinent recommendations shall be annually filed in accordance with the provisions of Section 4304 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 349.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Jail Industry Authority [4325. - 4328.]

4325.

(a) The board of supervisors of the Counties of Lake, Los Angeles, Madera, Sacramento, San Diego, San Joaquin, San Luis Obispo, Sonoma, Stanislaus, Tulare, Tuolumne, and Ventura may authorize, by ordinance or resolution, the sheriff or county director of corrections to create a Jail Industry Authority within the county jail system.

(b) The purpose of the Jail Industry Authority includes all of the following:

(1) To develop and operate industrial, agricultural, or service enterprises or programs employing prisoners in county correctional facilities under the jurisdiction of the sheriff or county director of corrections.

(2) To create and maintain working conditions within the enterprises or programs as similar as possible to those that prevail in private industry.

(3) To ensure prisoners have the opportunity to work productively and earn funds, if approved by the board of supervisors pursuant to Section 4019.3, and to acquire or improve effective work habits and occupational skills.

(4) To allow inmates who participate in the enterprise or program the opportunity to earn additional time credits allowed under
 Section 4019.1 or 4019.4, if authorized by the sheriff or county director of corrections.

(5) To operate a work program for inmates in county correctional facilities that will ultimately be self-supporting by generating sufficient funds from the sale of products and services to pay all the expenses of the program and that will provide goods and services that are or will be used by the county correctional facilities, thereby reducing the cost of its operation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 452, Sec. 4.   (AB 2012)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4327.

Upon the establishment of the Jail Industry Program or Jail Industry Authority, the board of supervisors shall establish a Jail Industries Fund, which may be a revolving fund, for funding the operations of the program. All jail industry income shall be deposited in, and any prisoner compensation shall be paid to the account of the prisoner from, the Jail Industries Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 452, Sec. 6.   (AB 2012)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4328.

Funds in a Jail Industries Fund may only be used for the operation or expansion of the jail industry program or to cover operating and construction costs of county detention facilities, and may not be transferred to the county general fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1303, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Blood Donations [4350. - 4351.]

4350.

This chapter applies to prisoners confined in city, county, or city and county jails, or industrial farms or road camps established pursuant to this title, who are under a sentence of 30 days or more.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4250 by Stats. 1967, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

4351.

Any prisoner, to whom this chapter applies, may voluntarily donate blood to a blood bank duly licensed by the State Department of Public Health. Prior to blood donation the prisoner shall be given an examination with all clothes removed by a physician and surgeon of the blood bank to whom blood is to be donated, and donations shall be refused unless such physician shall find the prisoner to be a suitable person for blood donation. No more than one such donation shall be permitted during any 72-day period.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4251 by Stats. 1967, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 4.7. COUNTY CORRECTIONAL FACILITY CAPITAL EXPENDITURE BOND ACT OF 1986 [4475. - 4495.]



  CHAPTER 1. Findings and Declarations [4475. - 4476.]

4475.

This title shall be known and may be cited as the County Correctional Facility Capital Expenditure Bond Act of 1986.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 52 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4476.

It is found and declared that:

(a) While the County Jail Capital Expenditure Bond Act of 1981 and the County Jail Capital Expenditure Bond Act of 1984 have helped eliminate many of the critically overcrowded conditions found in the 164 county jail facilities in the state, many problems remain.

(b) Numerous county jails and juvenile facilities throughout California are dilapidated and overcrowded.

(c) Capital improvements are necessary to protect life and safety of the persons confined or employed in jail facilities and to upgrade the health and sanitary conditions of those facilities.

(d) County jails are threatened with closure or the imposition of court supervision if health and safety deficiencies are not corrected immediately.

(e) Due to fiscal constraints associated with the loss of local property tax revenues, counties are unable to finance the construction of adequate jail and juvenile facilities.

(f) Local facilities for adults and juveniles are operating over capacity and the population of these facilities is still increasing. It is essential to the public safety that construction of new facilities proceed as expeditiously as possible to relieve overcrowding and to maintain public safety and security.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 52 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Fiscal Provisions [4480. - 4495.]

4480.

The State General Obligation Bond Law is adopted for the purpose of the issuance, sale, and repayment of, and otherwise providing with respect to, the bonds authorized to be issued pursuant to this title, and the provisions of that law are included in this title as though set out in full in this chapter except that, notwithstanding anything in the State General Obligation Bond Law, the maximum maturity of the bonds shall not exceed 20 years from the date of each respective series. The maturity of each respective series shall be calculated from the date of these series.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 52 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4481.

As used in this title, and for the purpose of this title, the following words shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Committee” means the 1986 County Correctional Facility Capital Expenditure Finance Committee created by Section 4483.

(b) “Fund” means the 1986 County Correctional Facility Expenditure Fund.

(c) “County juvenile facilities” means county juvenile halls, juvenile homes, ranches, or camps, and other juvenile detention facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 52 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4482.

There is in the State Treasury the 1986 County Correctional Facility Capital Expenditure Fund, which fund is hereby created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 52 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4483.

For the purpose of authorizing the issuance and sale, pursuant to the State General Obligation Bond Law, of the bonds authorized by this title, the 1986 County Correctional Facility Capital Expenditure Finance Committee is hereby created. The committee consists of the Governor or his or her designated representative, the Controller, the Treasurer, and the Director of Finance. The County Correctional Facility Capital Expenditure Committee shall be the “committee” as that term is used in the State General Obligation Bond Law, and the Treasurer shall serve as chairman of the Committee. The Board of Corrections is hereby designated as “the board” for purposes of this title and for the purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 52 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4484.

The committee is hereby authorized and empowered to create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California, in the aggregate amount of four hundred ninety-five million dollars ($495,000,000), in the manner provided in this title. That debt or debts, liability or liabilities, shall be created for the purpose of providing the funds to be used for the object and work specified in Section 4485 and for administrative costs incurred in connection therewith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 52 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4485.

Moneys in the fund may be available for the construction, reconstruction, remodeling, and replacement of county jail facilities, including, but not limited to, separate facilities for care of mentally ill inmates and persons arrested because of intoxication, and the performance of deferred maintenance on county jail facilities except that up to twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) of the money in the fund shall be available for the construction, reconstruction, remodeling, and replacement of county juvenile facilities, and the performance of deferred maintenance on county juvenile facilities. However, deferred maintenance for jails and juvenile facilities shall only include items with a useful life of at least 10 years.

Expenditure shall be made only if county matching funds of 25 percent are provided as determined by the Legislature, except that this requirement may be modified or waived by the Legislature where it determines that it is necessary to facilitate the expeditious and equitable construction of state and local correctional facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 52 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4485.5.

During the design and planning stage for county jail facilities whose construction, reconstruction, or remodeling is financed by the fund, consideration shall be given to proper design to allow for areas where persons arrested for misdemeanors who are attempting to obtain release on bail can be safely accommodated without the necessity of unclothed body searches.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 52 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4485.6.

In order to be eligible to receive funds derived from the issuance of General Obligation Bonds under this title, a county shall do all of the following:

(a) Adopt a plan to prohibit the detention of all juveniles in county jails unless otherwise authorized by law.

(b) Demonstrate that it has adequate facilities for mentally ill inmates or detainees and for those persons arrested because of inebriation, or demonstrate that it has a plan for the provision of services to these persons.

(c) Demonstrate that it has utilized, to the greatest practicable extent, alternatives to jail incarceration such as sheriff’s work release under Section 4024. 2, own recognizance release, and weekend work programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 52 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4485.7.

Moneys in the fund may be available for construction of joint-use correctional facilities housing county and state or federal prisoners or any combination thereof in proportion to the county’s benefit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 52 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4486.

(a) When sold, the bonds authorized by this title shall constitute valid and legally binding general obligations of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal and interest thereon.

(b) There shall be collected annually in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected such a sum, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, as shall be required to pay the interest and principal on the bonds maturing each year, and it is hereby made the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act which shall be necessary to collect that additional sum. 

(c) All money deposited in the fund which has been derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 52 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4487.

All money deposited in the fund pursuant to any provision of law requiring repayments to the state for assistance financed by the proceeds of the bonds authorized by this title shall be available for transfer to the General Fund. When transferred to the General Fund, this money shall be applied as a reimbursement to the General Fund on account of principal and interest on the bonds which have been paid from the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 52 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4488.

There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury for the purpose of this title such an amount as will equal the following:

(a) That sum annually as will be necessary to pay the principal of and the interest on the bonds issued and sold pursuant to the provisions of this title, as principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) That sum as is necessary to carry out the provisions of Section 4489, which sum is appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 52 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4489.

For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this title, the Director of Finance may by executive order authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which the committee has by resolution authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this title. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund and shall be disbursed by the board in accordance with this title. Any money made available under this section to the board shall be returned by the board to the General Fund from moneys received from the sale of bonds sold for the purpose of carrying out this title. These withdrawals from the General Fund shall be returned to the General Fund with interest at the rate which would have otherwise been earned by these sums in the Pooled Money Investment Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 52 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

4489.5.
